Illinois, session 104th, HB2557.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Cannabis Delivery License Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to regulate 7the delivery of cannabis to consumers in Illinois, ensure 8public safety, and promote equity by reducing barriers to 9entry for social equity applicants. 10    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 11    "Cannabis" has the meaning ascribed to it in the Cannabis 12Regulation and Tax Act. 13    "Delivery" means the transportation of cannabis or 14cannabis-infused products to a consumer from a licensed 15dispensary. 16    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Financial 17and Professional Regulation.18    "Social Equity Applicant" has the meaning ascribed to it 19in the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act.  20    Section 15. Cannabis Delivery License. 21    (a) A Cannabis Delivery License shall authorize the   HB2557- 2 -LRB104 09411 BDA 19470 b1license holder to deliver cannabis or cannabis-infused 2products purchased from a licensed dispensary directly to 3consumers within Illinois. 4    (b) License holders must comply with all applicable State 5and local laws, including transportation and tracking 6requirements established by the Department. 7    (c) Delivery services may only be conducted on behalf of 8licensed dispensaries. 9    Section 20. Application requirements. 10    (a) Applicants for a Cannabis Delivery License must submit 11an application to the Department, including: 12        (1) proof of compliance with zoning requirements; 13        (2) a proposed delivery plan demonstrating compliance 14    with State law;15        (3) background check authorization for all principal 16    officers; and17        (4) payment of applicable fees, unless waived under 18    subsection (c). 19    (b) Applications will be reviewed and approved based on 20criteria established by the Department.21    (c) Fees for applications and license issuance shall be 22waived for social equity applicants who:23        (1) meet the definition of a social equity applicant 24    under the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act; and25        (2) do not currently hold any other cannabis license   HB2557- 3 -LRB104 09411 BDA 19470 b1    issued under Illinois law. 2    Section 25. Operational requirements. 3    (a) Delivery personnel must: 4        (1) be at least 21 years of age;5        (2) possess a valid driver's license; and6        (3) be employees of the licensed delivery service. 7    (b) All deliveries must: 8        (1) be conducted in vehicles equipped with GPS 9    tracking; 10        (2) use secure, tamper-proof packaging; and11        (3) be recorded in the State's cannabis tracking 12    system. 13    (c) Deliveries may only occur during hours authorized by 14the Department. 15    Section 30. Penalties and enforcement. 16    (a) Violations of this Act or rules adopted under this Act 17may result in suspension or revocation of the Cannabis 18Delivery License. 19    (b) The Department may impose civil penalties for 20noncompliance, as established by rule. 21    Section 35. Rulemaking authority. The Department shall 22adopt rules as necessary to implement and enforce the 23provisions of this Act, including but not limited to:   HB2557- 4 -LRB104 09411 BDA 19470 b1    (1) application and renewal procedures; 2    (2) delivery service standards; and3    (3) recordkeeping and reporting requirements. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.